Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB196.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 912.1(35) of the act of June 3, 1937 (P.L.1333, No.320), known as the Pennsylvania Election Code, is amended to read:Section 912.1. Number of Signers Required for Nomination Petitions of Candidates at Primaries.--Candidates for nomination of offices as listed below shall present a nominating petition containing at least as many valid signatures of registered and enrolled members of the proper party as listed below:1234567891011121314151617181920212223 * * *(35) School director: [Ten] One hundred.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0196PN0143 - 2 - 1234